Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.830

Grain inspection revolving fund—Hop inspection fund—Grain warehouse audit account.

(1) All moneys collected as fees for weighing, grading, and inspecting commodities and all other fees collected under the provisions of this chapter, except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, shall be deposited in the grain inspection revolving fund, which is hereby established. The state treasurer is the custodian of the revolving fund. Disbursements from the revolving fund shall be on authorization of the director of the department of agriculture. The revolving fund is subject to the allotment procedure provided in chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for disbursements from the fund. The fund shall be used for all expenses directly incurred by the grain inspection program in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

(2) All fees collected for the inspection, grading, and testing of hops shall be deposited into the hop inspection fund, which is hereby established, and shall be retained by the department for the purpose of inspecting, grading, and testing hops. Any moneys in any fund retained by the department on July 1, 1963, and derived from hop inspection and grading shall be deposited to this hop inspection fund. For the purposes of research which would contribute to the development of superior hop varieties and to improve hop production and harvest practices, the department may expend up to twenty percent of the moneys deposited in the hop inspection fund during the fiscal year ending June 30th immediately preceding the year in which such expenditures are to be made. No expenditures shall be made under the provisions of this subsection when the hop inspection fund is, or the director may reasonably anticipate that it will be, reduced below twenty thousand dollars as the result of such expenditure or other necessary expenditures made to carry out the inspection, grading, and testing of hops.

(3) All moneys collected by the grain warehouse audit program, including grain warehouse license fees pursuant to RCW 22.09.050 and 22.09.055, shall be deposited by the director into the grain warehouse audit account, hereby created within the agricultural local fund established in RCW 43.23.230. Moneys collected shall be used to support the grain warehouse audit program.

[ 2012 c 25 s 4. Prior: 1994 sp.s. c 6 s 901; 1994 c 46 s 6; 1989 c 354 s 52; 1981 c 297 s 25; 1963 c 124 s 50. Formerly RCW 22.09.500.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 6: See notes following RCW 28A.310.020.

Effective date—1994 c 46: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Severability—1989 c 354: See note following RCW 15.36.012.

Severability—1981 c 297: See note following RCW 15.36.201.